es: Estilo de tubo remolcable: Banana/largo; Carruaje; Cabina/para sentarse; Sofá/asiento; Plano (deck); Dona/redondo; Autovaciable; Entrenador; Con alas; Otro
pt-BR: Boia rebocável estilo: Banana/longo; Carruagem (Chariot); Cockpit/assento embutido; Sofá/poltrona; Deck; Donut/redondo; Autodrenante; Treinador; Com asas; Outros
sl-SI: Stil vlečne tube: Banana/dolg; Kočija (chariot); Za sedenje (cockpit); Kavč/Sofa; Ploščat (deck); Krof/okrogel; Samopraznilni; Za učenje (trainer); S krilci; Drugo
nl: Towable tube stijl: Banaan/lang; Chariot; Cockpit/sit-in; Bank/lounge/sofa; Deck; Donut/rond; Zelflozend; Trainer; Gevleugeld; Overige
hu: Vontatható vízi eszköz stílusa: Banán/hosszú; Kocsi; Beülős; Kanapé/fotel; Lapos/fekvős; Fánk/kerek; Önürítős; Tanuló; Szárnyas; Egyéb
th: แบบท่อลากจูง: ทรงบานาน่าโบ๊ต/ยาว; ทรงรถม้า; ทรงที่นั่ง/นั่งในเรือ; ทรงโซฟา/เลานจ์; ทรงแบน; ทรงโดนัท/กลม; ระบายน้ำอัตโนมัติ; สำหรับฝึกหัด; ทรงมีปีก; อื่นๆ
ja: 牽引チューブスタイル: バナナ/ロング; チャリオット; コックピット/シットイン; カウチ/ラウンジ/ソファ; デッキ; ドーナツ/ラウンド; セルフベイリング (自動排水); トレーナー; ウィング; その他
pl: Styl dmuchanego pontonu: Banan / podłużna; Rydwan; Z kokpitem / siedziskiem; Kanapa / leżanka / sofa; Płaska (deck); Oponka / okrągła; Samoodpływowa; Treningowa; Ze skrzydełkami; Inny
el: Στυλ σωλήνα ρυμούλκησης: Μπανάνα/Μακρύ; Άρμα; Με κάθισμα (cockpit/sit-in); Καναπές/Lounge; Επίπεδο (deck); Ντόνατ/Στρογγυλό; Αυτοστραγγιζόμενο; Εκπαίδευσης; Με φτερά; Άλλο
sk-SK: Ťahané rúrkové prevedenie: Banán/Dlhý; Voz (Chariot); S vnútorným sedením (Cockpit/Sit-in); Gauč/Pohovka (Couch/Lounge/Sofa); Paluba (Deck); Šiška/Okrúhly; Samovylievací; Cvičný; S krídlami; Iné
da: Stil for towable tube: Banan/lang; Chariot; Cockpit/sit-in; Sofa/lounge; Deck; Donut/rund; Selvlænsende; Træner; Med vinger; Andet
cs: Typ tažené atrakce: Banán/podlouhlé; Vozík (chariot); Křeslo / sezení uvnitř; Pohovka/lehátko/gauč; Deska (Deck); Kobliha/kulaté; Samovylévací; Tréninkové; S křídly; Jiné
bg-BG: Стил на теглим воден ринг: Банан/Дълга; Колесница; С място за сядане; Тип диван/кресло; Плоска (Deck); Кръгла/Тип поничка; С автоматично отводняване; Тренировъчна; С крила; Друго
vi: Kiểu phao kéo: Hình quả chuối/Dài; Cỗ xe; Có khoang ngồi/Ngồi trong; Ghế dài/Ghế tựa/Sofa; Sàn nằm; Bánh donut/Tròn; Tự thoát nước; Dành cho người tập; Có cánh; Khác
hr-HR: Stil vučne cijevi: Banana / duga tuba; Kočija; S kokpitom / za sjedenje; Kao kauč / ležaljka / sofa; Ravna tuba (deck); U obliku krafne / okrugla; Samoprazneća; Za učenje (trainer); S krilima; Ostalo
de: Bauform des Towable Tubes: Banane/Lang; Chariot; Cockpit/Sit-in; Couch/Lounge/Sofa; Deck; Donut/Rund; Selbstlenzend; Trainer; Geflügelt; Sonstige
nb: Slepbart rør-stil: Banan/lang; Chariot; Cockpit / sitte i; Sofa/lounge; Plattform; Smultring/rund; Selvlensende; Trener; Med vinger; Annet
tr: Çekilebilir tüp tipi: Muz/Uzun; Savaş arabası (Chariot); Kokpit/Oturaklı; Kanepe/Şezlong/Koltuk; Düz (Deck); Simit/Yuvarlak; Su tahliyeli; Eğitimlik (Trainer); Kanatlı; Diğer
en: Towable tube style: Banana/Long; Chariot; Cockpit/Sit-in; Couch/Lounge/Sofa; Deck; Donut/Round; Self-bailing; Trainer; Winged; Other
lt-LT: Velkamo pripučiamo rato tipas: Bananas / ilgas; Karieta; Kabina / sėdima viduje; Kušetė / gultas / sofa; Plokščias; Spurgos / apvalios formos; Savaiminio drenažo; Mokomasis; Su sparnais; Kita
sv: Typ av bogserrör: Banan/lång; Vagn; Sittbrunn/sitt-i; Soffa/lounge; Däck; Donut/rund; Självlänsande; Tränare; Med vingar; Övrigt
pt-PT: Estilo do insuflável rebocável: Banana/Longo; Carruagem; Cockpit/Sentado; Sofá/Poltrona; Deck; Donut/Redondo; Drenagem automática; Treino; Com asas; Outro
fi: Vetorenkaan tyyli: Banaani/pitkä; Vaunu; Istuttava (ohjaamo); Sohva; Kansimalli; Rengas/pyöreä; Itsetyhjentyvä; Harjoitusmalli; Siivekäs; Muu
zh-CN: 可拖曳管式: 香蕉/长条形; 战车形; 座舱/坐入式; 长椅/休闲/沙发形; 甲板形; 甜甜圈/圆形; 自动排水式; 训练型; 带翼型; 其他
ro-RO: Stil de tub tractabil: Tip banană/Alungit; Tip car; Tip cabină/Sit-in; Canapea/Sezlong; Plat; Gogoașă/Rotund; Cu auto-drenare; De antrenament; Cu aripi; Altele
ru: Стиль буксировочной трубки: Банан/длинный; Колесница; С кокпитом/закрытый; Диван/кресло; Плоский (deck); Пончик/круглый; С самоотливом; Тренировочный; С крыльями; Другое
it: Tipo del trainabile: Banana/lungo; A biga (chariot); A pozzetto/sit-in; Divano/poltrona; Piatto (deck); Ciambella/rotondo; Autosvuotante; Da allenamento (trainer); Con ali; Altro
ko: 견인 가능한 튜브 형태: 바나나형/롱형; 전차형; 조종석형/탑승형; 카우치/라운지/소파형; 데크형; 도넛형/원형; 자동 배수형; 훈련용; 윙형; 기타
zh-TW: 拖曳氣墊船樣式: 香蕉/長型; 戰車型; 座艙/坐入式; 躺椅/沙發型; 甲板型; 甜甜圈/圓形; 自動排水; 訓練型; 飛翼型; 其他
fr: Type de bouée tractée: Banane/long; Chariot; Cockpit/assis; Canapé/fauteuil/divan; Plateforme; Donut/rond; Autovideur; Débutant; À ailes; Autre